Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section,  “natural gas utility” or “utility” means a public
utility providing natural gas service to customers.
(2) A natural gas utility shall provide notice under subsection (3) of this section if:
(a) The utility plans to increase  the amount of hydrogen that the utility blends with na-
tural gas that the utility delivers or furnishes through the utility’s distribution system; and
(b) This is the first time that the amount of hydrogen  that the utility plans to blend is
such that the ratio of the volume of hydrogen gas to the  volume of natural gas, expressed
as a percentage, is greater than 2.5 percent.
(3) A natural gas utility shall,  at least 60 days prior to the date the utility begins blending
hydrogen in an amount described under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Provide a notice to each customer of the utility that is affected by the plan to in-
crease the amount of hydrogen that the  utility blends with the natural gas. The notice may
be provided to each customer in the same manner that the customer chooses to  receive a
billing statement from the utility.
(b) File with the Public Utility  Commission a notice that includes the following informa-
tion:
(A) The reason for the increase in the amount of hydrogen that the utility plans to blend
with the natural gas.
(B) Any required siting or permitting approvals.
(C) A description of any public outreach conducted by the utility regarding the plan.
(D) Any other information requested by the commission.
(4) A natural  gas utility that has a program for blending hydrogen with the natural gas
that the utility delivers or furnishes through the utility’s distribution system shall  maintain
on the utility’s website information regarding the utility’s program for  blending hydrogen
with natural gas and how a customer may  communicate with the utility about the utility’s
program for blending hydrogen with natural gas.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding the preconditions described under section  2 (2)(a) and (b)
of this 2025 Act, if by June 30, 2030, a natural gas utility has a program for blending hydrogen
with the natural gas  that the utility delivers or furnishes through the utility’s distribution
Enrolled Senate Bill 685 (SB 685-A) Page 1
system and has not provided a notice under section 2 (3)(a) of this 2025 Act, the  natural gas
utility shall provide a notice as described under section 2 (3)(a) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 685 (SB 685-A) Page 2